Nevada, session 83, SB362.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 463 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 to 6, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 2. The Commission shall by regulation provide for the
establishment of a program that allows a patron of a licensee who
engages in the issuance of credit, check cashing or direct
marketing of gaming opportunities to self-limit access to the
issuance of credit, check cashing or direct marketing of gaming
opportunities. The program must include, without limitation:
1. The development of written materials for dissemination to
a patron explaining the program.
2. The development of written forms allowing a patron to
participate in the program.
3. Standards and procedures that allow a patron to be
prohibited from access to check cashing, the issuance of credit
and the participation in direct marketing of gaming opportunities.
4. Standards and procedures that allow a patron to be
removed from direct marketing that conveys a gaming opportunity
from a licensee, including, without limitation, communications
through:
(a) Mail;
(b) Telephone;
(c) Text message; or
(d) Electronic mail.
 As used in this subsection, “gaming opportunity” means a free
play or rebate offer, a tournament entry offer or any other offer or
promotion that may directly or indirectly be used as a wager.
5. Procedures and forms with which a patron may notify a
designated officer of a licensee within 10 days after the receipt of
any direct marketing pursuant to subsection 4.
Sec. 3. 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the
Commission shall adopt regulations and establish the necessary
fees for a license to operate a tavern gaming establishment.
2. A tavern gaming establishment must meet the following
requirements:
-
*SB362*

– 4 –
(a) The primary business of the establishment must be the sale
of alcoholic beverages for on-premises consumption as authorized
pursuant to chapter 369 of NRS;
(b) The establishment must have a permanent physical bar
with individual seating for not less than nine patrons at all times;
(c) The establishment must occupy an area of at least 2,000
square feet which is open and available for use by patrons, with
seating capacity for not less than 20 persons not engaged in
gaming activities; and
(d) The establishment must operate a restaurant. As used in
this paragraph, “restaurant” means a business that sells and
prepares food for immediate consumption, which may involve
cooking from raw ingredients or reheating pre-cooked food, offers
a fixed menu and provides a designated area for patrons to
consume meals. The term does not require a full-sized kitchen.
3. A tavern gaming establishment licensed pursuant to this
section may offer the following gaming activities:
(a) The operation of 25 or fewer gaming devices;
(b) The operation of self-service wagering kiosks, which allow
a patron to create and manage wagering accounts and place bets
on authorized gaming activities; and
(c) The sale of lottery tickets, if authorized by this State.
Sec. 4. 1. The jurisdiction of the Board to investigate and
initiate a hearing before the Commission pursuant to NRS
463.310, and the jurisdiction of the Commission to conduct
proceedings and impose discipline in accordance with this section
and NRS 463.310 to 463.3145, inclusive, is fully retained and is
not divested in any circumstance where a person or entity licensed,
registered, found suitable or preliminarily found suitable by the
Commission pursuant to this chapter or chapter 462, 464 or 466 of
NRS is no longer engaged in the activity or in the position for
which Commission approval was required.
2. The surrender or attempted surrender of a license,
registration, finding of suitability or preliminary finding of
suitability is not effective until accepted by the Board.
Sec. 5. The Commission shall, with the advice and assistance
of the Board, adopt regulations governing interactive gaming that
allow for a sports pool, including the acceptance of wagers on
sporting events and other events from patrons located within and
outside of this State.
Sec. 6. 1. For the purposes of subsection 4 of NRS 463.643,
an institutional investor is not eligible to receive or hold a waiver
granted by the Commission if the institutional investor:
-
*SB362*

– 5 –
(a) Will own, directly or indirectly, more than 25 percent of the
voting securities of the publicly traded corporation acquired other
than through a debt restructuring; and
(b) Holds the voting securities for investment purposes only.
2. An institutional investor that has been granted a waiver by
the Commission may own more than 25 percent but not more than
29 percent, at any given time, of any class of the voting securities
of the publicly traded corporation if such additional ownership
results from a stock repurchase program and the institutional
investor does not acquire additional voting securities of the
publicly traded corporation.
3. For the purposes of NRS 463.530, 463.585 and 463.595, an
institutional investor is not eligible to receive or hold a waiver
granted by the Commission if:
(a) It will own, directly or indirectly, more than 25 percent of
the voting or equity securities of the corporate licensee or a
holding company acquired other than through a debt
restructuring; and
(b) The voting or equity securities held do not, directly or
indirectly, allow the investor to vote for the election of members of
the board of directors or cause any action which the Commission
finds to be inconsistent with investment purposes.
4. As used in this section, “institutional investor” means:
(a) A bank, as defined in the Securities Exchange Act of 1934,
15 U.S.C. § 78c(a)(6);
(b) An insurance company, as defined in the Investment
Company Act of 1940, 15 U.S.C. § 80a-2(a)(17), as amended;
(c) An investment company registered under the Investment
Company Act of 1940, 15 U.S.C. § 80a-8, as amended;
(d) An investment advisor registered under the Investment
Advisers Act of 1940, 15 U.S.C. § 80b-3, as amended;
(e) Collective trust funds, as defined in the Investment
Company Act of 1940, 15 U.S.C. § 80a-3(e)(11), as amended;
(f) An employee benefit plan or pension fund that is subject to
the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as
amended, other than an employee benefit plan or pension fund
sponsored by a publicly traded corporation registered with the
Commission;
(g) A state or federal government pension plan;
(h) A group comprised entirely of persons specified in
paragraphs (a) to (g), inclusive; or
(i) Such other persons as the Commission determines for
reasons consistent with the policies of this State pursuant to NRS
463.0129 and 463.489.
-
*SB362*

– 6 –
Sec. 7. NRS 463.016425 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
463.016425 1. “Interactive gaming” means the conduct of
gambling games through the use of communications technology that
allows a person, utilizing money, checks, electronic checks,
electronic transfers of money, credit cards, debit cards or any other
instrumentality, to transmit to a computer information to assist in
the placing of a bet or wager and corresponding information related
to the display of the game, game outcomes or other similar
information. The term:
(a) Includes, without limitation, Internet poker [.] and a sports
pool.
(b) Does not include the operation of a race book [or sports
pool] that uses communications technology approved by the Board
pursuant to regulations adopted by the Commission to accept wagers
originating within this state for races . [, or sporting events or other
events.]
2. As used in this section, “communications technology”
means any method used and the components employed by an
establishment to facilitate the transmission of information,
including, without limitation, transmission and reception by systems
based on wire, cable, radio, microwave, light, optics or computer
data networks, including, without limitation, the Internet and
intranets.
Sec. 8. NRS 463.0177 is hereby amended to read as follows:
463.0177 “Nonrestricted license” or “nonrestricted operation”
means:
1. [A] Except as otherwise provided in section 3 of this act, a
state gaming license for, or an operation consisting of, 16 or more
slot machines;
2. A license for, or operation of, any number of slot machines
together with any other game, gaming device, race book or sports
pool at one establishment; or
3. A license for, or the operation of, a slot machine route.
Sec. 9. NRS 463.220 is hereby amended to read as follows:
463.220 1. The Board shall present its final order upon an
application to the Commission at the next meeting of the
Commission.
2. The Commission may, after considering the
recommendation of the Board, issue to the applicant named, as a
natural person, and to the licensed gaming establishment, as a
business entity, under the name or style therein designated, a state
gaming license, or deny the same. The Commission may limit the
license or place such conditions thereon as it may deem necessary in
the public interest. The Commission may, if it considers necessary,
-
*SB362*

– 7 –
issue a probationary license. No state gaming license may be
assigned either in whole or in part.
3. The Commission may limit or place such conditions as it
may deem necessary in the public interest upon any registration,
finding of suitability or approval for which application has been
made.
4. After final order of the Board recommending [denial] :
(a) Denial of an application, the Commission, after considering
the recommendation of the Board, may:
[(a)] (1) Deny the application;
[(b)] (2) Reject the application;
[(c)] (3) Remand the matter to the Board for such further
investigation and reconsideration as the Commission may order; or
[(d)] (4) By unanimous vote of the members present, grant the
application for a license, registration, finding of suitability or
approval.
(b) Approval of an application, the Commission, after
considering the recommendation of the Board, may, by
unanimous vote of the members present, deny the application for a
license, registration, finding of suitability or approval.
 For the purposes of this section, a tie vote of the Board upon an
application does not constitute a recommendation of denial of the
application. A rejection of the application does not constitute a
determination of the suitability of the applicant or a denial of the
application of the applicant.
5. If the Commission is not satisfied that an applicant approved
by the Board is qualified to be licensed under this chapter, the
Commission may cause to be made such investigation into and
conduct such hearings concerning the qualifications of the applicant
in accordance with its regulations as it may deem necessary.
6. If the Commission desires further investigation be made or
to conduct any hearings, it shall, within 30 days after presentation of
the recommendation of the Board so notify the applicant and set a
date for hearing, if a hearing is requested by the applicant. Final
action by the Commission must be taken within 120 days after the
recommendation of the Board has been presented to the
Commission. Failure of the Commission to take action within 120
days shall be deemed to constitute approval of the applicant by the
Commission, and a license must be issued forthwith upon
compliance by the applicant with the provisions of NRS 463.225.
7. The Commission has full and absolute power and authority
to deny any application for any cause it deems reasonable. If an
application is denied, the Commission shall prepare and file its
written decision upon which its order denying the application is
based.
-
*SB362*

– 8 –
Sec. 10. NRS 463.270 is hereby amended to read as follows:
463.270 1. Subject to the power of the Commission to deny,
revoke, suspend, condition or limit licenses, any state license in
force may be renewed by the Commission for the next succeeding
license period upon proper application for renewal and payment of
state license fees and taxes as required by law and the regulations of
the Commission.
2. All state gaming licenses are subject to renewal on the first
day of each January and all quarterly state gaming licenses on the
first day of each calendar quarter thereafter.
3. Application for renewal must be filed with the Commission,
and all state license fees and taxes required by law, including,
without limitation, NRS 368A.200, 463.370, 463.373 to 463.3855,
inclusive, 463.660, 464.015 and 464.040, must be paid to the Board
on or before the dates respectively provided by law for each fee or
tax.
4. Application for renewal of licenses for slot machines only
must be made by the operators of the locations where such machines
are situated.
5. Any person failing to pay any state license fees or taxes due
at the times respectively provided shall pay in addition to such
license fees or taxes a penalty of not less than $50 or 25 percent of
the amount due, whichever is the greater, but not more than $1,000
if the fees or taxes are less than 10 days late and in no case in excess
of $5,000. The penalty must be collected as are other charges,
license fees and penalties under this chapter.
6. Any person who operates, carries on or exposes for play any
gambling game, gaming device or slot machine or who
manufactures, sells or distributes any gaming device, equipment,
material or machine used in gaming after the person’s license
becomes subject to renewal, and thereafter fails to apply for renewal
as provided in this section, is guilty of a misdemeanor and, in
addition to the penalties provided by law, is liable to the State of
Nevada for all license fees, taxes and penalties which would have
been due upon application for renewal.
7. If any licensee or other person fails to renew his or her
license as provided in this section, the Commission may order the
immediate closure of all his or her gaming activity until the license
is renewed by the payment of the necessary fees, taxes, interest and
any penalties. Except for a license for which fees are based on the
gross revenue of the licensee, failure to renew a license within 30
days after the date required by this chapter shall be deemed a
surrender of the license.
8. The voluntary surrender of a license by a licensee does not
become effective until accepted in the manner provided [in the
-
*SB362*

– 9 –
regulations of the Commission.] by the Board. The surrender of a
license does not relieve the former licensee of any penalties, fines,
fees, taxes or interest due.
Sec. 11. NRS 463.370 is hereby amended to read as follows:
463.370 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section and
NRS 463.373, the Commission shall charge and collect from each
licensee a license fee based upon all the gross revenue of the
licensee as follows:
(a) Three and one-half percent of all the gross revenue of the
licensee which does not exceed $50,000 per calendar month;
(b) Four and one-half percent of all the gross revenue of the
licensee which exceeds $50,000 per calendar month and does not
exceed $134,000 per calendar month; and
(c) Six and three-quarters percent of all the gross revenue of the
licensee which exceeds $134,000 per calendar month.
2. Unless the licensee has been operating for less than a full
calendar month, the Commission shall charge and collect the fee
prescribed in subsection 1, based upon the gross revenue for the
preceding calendar month, on or before the 15th day of the
following month. Except for the fee based on the first full month of
operation, the fee is an estimated payment of the license fee for the
third month following the month whose gross revenue is used as its
basis.
3. When a licensee has been operating for less than a full
calendar month, the Commission shall charge and collect the fee
prescribed in subsection 1, based on the gross revenue received
during that month, on or before the 15th day of the following
calendar month of operation. After the first full calendar month of
operation, the Commission shall charge and collect the fee based on
the gross revenue received during that month, on or before the 15th
day of the following calendar month. The payment of the fee due for
the first full calendar month of operation must be accompanied by
the payment of a fee equal to three times the fee for the first full
calendar month. This additional amount is an estimated payment of
the license fees for the next 3 calendar months. Thereafter, each
license fee must be paid in the manner described in subsection 2.
Any deposit held by the Commission on July 1, 1969, must be
treated as an advance estimated payment.
4. All revenue received from any game or gaming device
which is operated on the premises of a licensee, regardless of
whether any portion of the revenue is shared with any other person,
must be attributed to the licensee for the purposes of this section and
counted as part of the gross revenue of the licensee. Any other
person who is authorized to receive a share of the revenue from any
game or gaming device that is operated on the premises of a licensee
-
*SB362*

– 10 –
is liable to the licensee for that person’s proportionate share of the
license fees paid by the licensee pursuant to this section and shall
remit or credit the full proportionate share to the licensee on or
before the 15th day of each calendar month. A licensee is not liable
to any other person authorized to receive a share of the licensee’s
revenue from any game or gaming device that is operated on the
premises of the licensee for that person’s proportionate share of the
license fees to be remitted or credited to the licensee by that person
pursuant to this section.
5. Any person required to pay a fee pursuant to this section
shall file with the Commission, on or before the 15th day of each
calendar month, a report showing the amount of all gross revenue
received during the preceding calendar month. Each report must be
accompanied by:
(a) The fee due based on the revenue of the month covered by
the report; and
(b) An adjustment for the difference between the estimated fee
previously paid for the month covered by the report, if any, and the
fee due for the actual gross revenue earned in that month. If
the adjustment is less than zero, a credit must be applied to the
estimated fee due with that report.
6. If the amount of license fees required to be reported and paid
pursuant to this section is later determined to be greater or less than
the amount actually reported and paid, the Commission shall:
(a) Charge and collect the additional license fees determined to
be due, with interest thereon until paid; or
(b) Refund any overpayment to the person entitled thereto
pursuant to this chapter, with interest thereon.
 Interest pursuant to paragraph (a) must be computed at the rate
prescribed in NRS 17.130 from the first day of the first month
following the due date of the additional license fees until paid.
Interest pursuant to paragraph (b) must be computed at one-half the
rate prescribed in NRS 17.130 from the first day of the first month
following the date of overpayment until paid.
7. Failure to pay the fees provided for in this section shall be
deemed a surrender of the license at the expiration of the period for
which the estimated payment of fees has been made, as established
in subsection 2.
8. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 463.386, the amount
of the fee prescribed in subsection 1 must not be prorated.
9. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 463.386, if a licensee
ceases operation, the Commission shall:
(a) Charge and collect the additional license fees determined to
be due with interest computed pursuant to paragraph (a) of
subsection 6; or
-
*SB362*

– 11 –
(b) Refund any overpayment to the licensee with interest
computed pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 6,
 based upon the gross revenue of the licensee during the last 3
months immediately preceding the cessation of operation, or
portions of those last 3 months.
10. If in any month, the amount of gross revenue is less than
zero, the licensee may offset the loss against gross revenue in
succeeding months until the loss has been fully offset.
11. If in any month, the amount of the license fee due is less
than zero, the licensee is entitled to receive a credit against any
license fees due in succeeding months until the credit has been fully
offset.
12. The Commission may, in response to a state of emergency
or declaration of disaster proclaimed by the Governor or by
resolution of the Legislature pursuant to NRS 414.070:
(a) Reduce any fee required pursuant to this section based on
the actual gross gaming revenue generated during the state of
emergency or declaration of disaster. The reduction must be
proportional to the decrease in revenue experienced by the
licensee as determined by the Board.
(b) Allow a licensee to defer any monthly payment in an
amount and for a duration as determined by the Commission.
(c) Forgive the fees accrued if the licensee demonstrates
significant financial hardship resulting from the state of
emergency or declaration of disaster.
Sec. 12. NRS 463.373 is hereby amended to read as follows:
463.373 1. Before issuing a state gaming license to an
applicant for a restricted operation, the Commission shall charge
and collect from the applicant for each slot machine for each quarter
year:
(a) A license fee of $81 for each slot machine if the applicant
will have at least 1 but not more than 5 slot machines.
(b) A license fee of $405 plus $141 for each slot machine in
excess of 5 if the applicant will have at least 6 but not more than 15
slot machines.
2. The Commission shall charge and collect the fee prescribed
in subsection 1:
(a) On or before the last day of the last month in a calendar
quarter, for the ensuing calendar quarter, from a licensee whose
operation is continuing.
(b) In advance from a licensee who begins operation or puts
additional slot machines into play during a calendar quarter.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6 and NRS
463.386, no proration of the fee prescribed in subsection 1 may be
allowed for any reason.
-
*SB362*

– 12 –
4. The operator of the location where slot machines are situated
shall pay the fee prescribed in subsection 1 upon the total number of
slot machines situated in that location, whether or not the machines
are owned by one or more licensee-owners.
5. Any person who is authorized to receive a share of the
revenue from any slot machine that is operated on the premises of a
licensee is liable to the licensee for that person’s proportionate share
of the fee prescribed in subsection 1 and shall remit or credit his or
her full proportionate share to the licensee on or before the last day
of the last month in a calendar quarter, if the licensee is paying the
fee in accordance with paragraph (a) of subsection 2, or, if the
licensee is paying the fee in accordance with paragraph (b) of
subsection 2, on or before the date on which the licensee pays the
fee. A licensee is not liable to any person who is authorized to
receive a share of the revenue from any slot machine that is operated
on the premises of the licensee for that person’s proportionate share
of the fee prescribed in subsection 1.
6. The Commission may, in response to a state of emergency
or declaration of disaster proclaimed by the Governor or by
resolution of the Legislature pursuant to NRS 414.070:
(a) Reduce any fee required pursuant to this section based on
the actual gross gaming revenue generated during the state of
emergency or declaration of disaster. The reduction must be
proportional to the decrease in revenue experienced by the
licensee as determined by the Board.
(b) Allow a licensee to defer any monthly payment in an
amount and for a duration as determined by the Commission.
(c) Forgive the fees accrued if the licensee demonstrates
significant financial hardship resulting from the state of
emergency or declaration of disaster.
Sec. 13. NRS 463.375 is hereby amended to read as follows:
463.375 1. In addition to any other state gaming license fees
provided for in this chapter, before issuing a state gaming license to
an applicant for a nonrestricted operation, the Commission shall
charge and collect from the applicant a license fee of $80 for each
slot machine for each calendar year.
2. The Commission shall charge and collect the fee prescribed
in subsection 1, at the rate of $20 for each slot machine for each
calendar quarter:
(a) On or before the last day of the last month in a calendar
quarter, for the ensuing calendar quarter, from a licensee whose
operation is continuing.
(b) In advance from a licensee who begins operation or puts
additional slot machines into play during a calendar quarter.
-
*SB362*

– 13 –
3. Except as provided in subsection 6 and NRS 463.386, no
proration of the quarterly amount prescribed in subsection 2 may be
allowed for any reason.
4. The operator of the location where slot machines are situated
shall pay the fee prescribed in subsection 1 upon the total number of
slot machines situated in that location, whether the machines are
owned by one or more licensee-owners.
5. Any other person who is authorized to receive a share of the
revenue from any slot machine that is operated on the premises of a
licensee is liable to the licensee for that person’s proportionate share
of the license fees paid by the licensee pursuant to this section and
shall remit or credit the full proportionate share to the licensee on or
before the dates set forth in subsection 2. A licensee is not liable to
any other person authorized to receive a share of the licensee’s
revenue from any slot machine that is operated on the premises of a
licensee for that person’s proportionate share of the license fees to
be remitted or credited to the licensee by that person pursuant to this
section.
6. The Commission may, in response to a state of emergency
or declaration of disaster proclaimed by the Governor or by
resolution of the Legislature pursuant to NRS 414.070:
(a) Reduce any fee required pursuant to this section based on
the actual gross gaming revenue generated during the state of
emergency or declaration of disaster. The reduction must be
proportional to the decrease in revenue experienced by the
licensee as determined by the Board.
(b) Allow a licensee to defer any monthly payment in an
amount and for a duration as determined by the Commission.
(c) Forgive the fees accrued if the licensee demonstrates
significant financial hardship resulting from the state of
emergency or declaration of disaster.
Sec. 14. NRS 465.094 is hereby amended to read as follows:
465.094 The provisions of NRS 465.092 and 465.093 do not
apply to global risk management pursuant to NRS 463.810 and
463.820 , interactive gaming pursuant to section 5 of this act or to
a wager placed by a person for the person’s own benefit or, without
compensation, for the benefit of another that is accepted or received
by, placed with, or sent, transmitted or relayed to:
1. A race book or sports pool that is licensed pursuant to
chapter 463 of NRS, if the wager is accepted or received within this
State and otherwise complies with all other applicable laws and
regulations concerning wagering;
2. A person who is licensed to engage in off-track pari-mutuel
wagering pursuant to chapter 464 of NRS, if the wager is accepted
or received within this State and otherwise complies with
-
*SB362*

– 14 –
subsection 3 of NRS 464.020 and all other applicable laws and
regulations concerning wagering;
3. Any other person or establishment that is licensed to engage
in wagering pursuant to title 41 of NRS, if the wager is accepted or
received within this State and otherwise complies with all other
applicable laws and regulations concerning wagering; or
4. Any other person or establishment that is licensed to engage
in wagering in another jurisdiction and is permitted to accept or
receive a wager from patrons within this State under an agreement
entered into by the Governor pursuant to NRS 463.747.
H
-
*SB362*